Hawaii statutes.
§273-1 Franchise. The comptroller, by
and with the consent of the governor, may enter into contract with any
association of persons who may associate themselves together under the general
corporation law of the State, and by the general law in relation to
corporations and subject to all the provisions thereof, for the purpose of
building and operating a railroad or railroads in any part of the State. [L
1878, c 29, §1; RL 1925, §877; RL 1935, §1783; RL 1945, §5041; RL 1955, §106-1;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §273-1]

Case Notes

Right of eminent domain conferred only upon such corporations
as have entered into a contract with the Minister of Interior for the purpose
of building and operating railroad and not upon all corporations that have
incorporated under general corporation law for such purpose. 11 H. 479.

Right of eminent domain delegated to O.R. & L. Co. does
not carry with it the right to condemn public land in Honolulu Harbor.
11 H. 717.

Cited: 21 H. 375, 377.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next